Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2207
Offices; designate in articles of incorporation; change; duties.

A professional corporation shall have only those offices which are designated by street address in the articles of incorporation, and shall not change any such office or offices without amendment of the articles of incorporation.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 7, p. 557.